Louisiana, session 2026, HB49.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 11:2225.4(A)(2)(b) and (c) and (B) and 2262.1(A)(2)(b) and (B) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 11:157(E), 2225.4(A)(2)(d), (D)(3), and (E), and
2262.1(A)(2)(c), (D)(3), and (E) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§157. Firefighters' Retirement System; Municipal Police Employees' Retirement
System; optional membership; refund of employee contributions; irrevocable
election; reenrollment; membership verification information
* * *
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-318 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 49
E. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to an employee whose date
of employment with an employer occurs on or after January 1, 2027, regardless of
the date the employee first became eligible for system membership.
* * *
§2225.4. Unfunded accrued liability; payment by employer
A.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(b) A participating employer shall be deemed to have partially dissolved its
police department if either of the following occurs:
(i) The number of participating employees of the employer as of June
thirtieth is less than seventy percent of the number of participating employees of the
employer as of June thirtieth of the prior year target employee count and either the
number of participating employees decreases by at least two or the number of
participating employees is zero. zero or the number of participating employees is less
than the target employee count by at least:
(aa) Two, for a valuation dated June 30, 2023, or earlier.
(bb) Three for a valuation dated June 30, 2024, or later.
(ii) The number of participating employees of the employer as of June
thirtieth is at least fifty fewer than the number of participating employees of the
employer as of June thirtieth of the prior year target employee count.
(c) If the calculation of the percentage pursuant to Item (b)(i) of this
Paragraph does not result in a whole number, the actuary shall round to the nearest
lower whole number.
(d) If, on the June thirtieth immediately following the transfer of employees
from the city to the Baton Rouge Regional Airport Authority, the city is deemed to
have partially dissolved its police department, the system shall determine whether
the partial dissolution would have occurred without the transfer of employees. If no
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-318 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 49
dissolution would have occurred without the transfer and the employees transferred
to the authority remain members of the system, the city shall not be required to make
the payments otherwise required by this Section. If the system determines that a
partial dissolution would have occurred regardless of the transfer, and the transferred
employees remain members of the system, then the amount due under the provisions
of this Subparagraph shall be calculated without regard to those transferred
employees.
B.(1) Any amount due pursuant to Subsection A of this Section shall be
determined by the actuary employed by the system and shall be amortized over
fifteen years in equal monthly payments with interest at the system's valuation
interest rate. Such Any such payments required based on a valuation dated June 30,
2023, or earlier shall be payable to the system electronically beginning July first of
the second fiscal year following the determination by the actuary and in the same
manner as regular payroll payments to the system. Any such payments required
based on a valuation dated June 30, 2024, or later shall be payable to the system
electronically beginning July first of the third fiscal year following the determination
by the actuary and in the same manner as regular payroll payments to the system.
Beginning July first of the fiscal year following the withdrawal, interest shall accrue
at the system's actuarial valuation rate, compounded annually.
(2)(a) If the number of participating employees of an employer subject to
Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section returns to at least the number of participating
employees as of the June thirtieth immediately preceding the withdrawal target
employee count used to determine that a particular withdrawal occurred, the
payments required by this Section shall cease on the July first following the
determination by the actuary that a sufficient increase in participating employees has
occurred, and no further payments shall be due with respect to the withdrawal.
(b) If the number of participating employees of an employer subject to
Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section increases but does not return to at least the target
employee count used to determine that the particular withdrawal occurred, the
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-318 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 49
payments required by this Section shall be proportionately reduced on the July first
following the determination by the actuary that an increase in participating
employees has occurred.
(c) Any payments made pursuant to this Section shall be credited as an offset
of any amounts due by the employer attributable to any subsequent withdrawal that
occurs within fifteen years of the payments.
* * *
D. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
* * *
(3) "Target employee count" shall mean:
(a) For a valuation dated June 30, 2025, or earlier, the number of
participating employees of the employer as of June thirtieth of the prior year.
(b) For the valuation dated June 30, 2026, the average of the numbers of
participating employees of the employer as of June thirtieth of each of the prior two
years.
(c) For a valuation dated June 30, 2027, or later, the average of the numbers
of participating employees of the employer as of June thirtieth of each of the prior
three years.
E. If an employer is delinquent on withdrawal payments on the thirtieth of
June in any year, the provisions of Subparagraph (B)(2)(b) of this Section shall not
apply to the withdrawal on which the payments are delinquent and for purposes of
any additional withdrawal determined by the actuary based on the June thirtieth
valuation of that year, the beginning payment date pursuant to Paragraph (B)(1) of
this Section shall be the July first of the second fiscal year following the
determination by the actuary, the target employee count shall be as provided in
Subparagraph (D)(3)(a) of this Section, and the provisions of Subparagraph (B)(2)(b)
shall not apply.
* * *
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-318 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 49
§2262.1. Dissolution of fire department; unfunded accrued liability; payment by
employer
A.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(b) An employer shall be deemed to have partially dissolved its fire
department if either of the following occurs:
(i) The number of participating employees of the employer as of the thirtieth
of June is less than seventy percent of the number of participating employees of the
employer on the thirtieth of June of the prior year target employee count and either
the number of participating employees decreases by at least three or the number of
participating employees is zero.
(ii) The number of participating employees of the employer as of the thirtieth
of June is at least fifty fewer than the number of participating employees of the
employer as of the thirtieth of June of the prior year target employee count.
(c) If the calculation of the percent pursuant to Item (b)(i) of this Paragraph
does not result in a whole number, the actuary shall round to the nearest lower whole
number.
B.(1) Any amount due pursuant to Subsection A of this Section shall be
determined by the actuary employed by the system and shall be amortized over
fifteen years in equal payments with interest at the system's valuation rate. Payments
for withdrawals that occur on or after July 1, 2021, that are based on a valuation
dated June 30, 2023, or earlier shall be payable beginning the first of July of the
second fiscal year following the determination by the actuary and in the same
manner as regular payroll payments to the system. Payments for withdrawals that
are based on a valuation dated June 30, 2024, or later shall be payable beginning the
first of July of the third fiscal year following the determination by the actuary and
in the same manner as regular payroll payments to the system. Beginning on the first
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-318 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 49
of July of the fiscal year following withdrawal, interest shall accrue at the system's
actuarial valuation rate, compounded annually.
(2)(a) If the number of participating employees of an employer subject to
Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section returns to at least the number of participating
employees as of the thirtieth of June immediately preceding the withdrawal target
employee count used to determine that the particular withdrawal occurred, the
payments required by this Section shall cease on the first of July following the
determination by the actuary that a sufficient increase in participating employees has
occurred, and no further payments shall be due with respect to the withdrawal.
(b) If the number of participating employees of an employer subject to
Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section increases but does not return to at least the target
employee count used to determine that the particular withdrawal occurred, the
payments required by this Section shall be proportionately reduced on the first of
July following the determination by the actuary that an increase in participating
employees has occurred.
(c) Any payments made pursuant to this Section shall be credited as an offset
of any amounts due by the employer attributable to any subsequent withdrawal that
occurs within fifteen years of the payments.
* * *
D. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall mean:
* * *
(3) "Target employee count" shall mean:
(a) For a valuation dated June 30, 2025, or earlier, the number of
participating employees of the employer as of June thirtieth of the prior year.
(b) For the valuation dated June 30, 2026, the average of the numbers of
participating employees of the employer as of June thirtieth of each of the prior two
years.
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-318 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 49
(c) For a valuation dated June 30, 2027, or later, the average of the numbers
of participating employees of the employer as of June thirtieth of each of the prior
three years.
E. If an employer is delinquent on withdrawal payments on the thirtieth of
June in any year, the provisions of Subparagraph (B)(2)(b) of this Section shall not
apply to the withdrawal on which the payments are delinquent and for purposes of
any additional withdrawal determined by the actuary based on the June thirtieth
valuation of that year, the beginning payment date pursuant to Paragraph (B)(1) of
this Section shall be the first of July of the second fiscal year following the
determination by the actuary, the target employee count shall be as provided in
Subparagraph (D)(3)(a) of this Section, and the provisions of Subparagraph (B)(2)(b)
of this Section shall not apply.
Section 2. The actuary for the Municipal Police Employees' Retirement System and
the Firefighters' Retirement System shall redetermine the withdrawal of participating
employers based on the June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025, actuarial valuations pursuant to
the provisions of this Act. However, any employer who was not identified prior to the
effective date of this Act as having partially dissolved its police department or fire
department shall not be deemed to have partially dissolved its police department or fire
department based on the redetermination of withdrawal for the June 30, 2024, and June 30,
2025, actuarial valuations.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-318 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 49